Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

23-78-101. Short title.

The short title of this article 78 is the "Growing Great Teachers Act".

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-190), ch. 153, p. 1806, § 1, effective May 10.

23-78-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that:

High-quality teaching is the linchpin for effective, high-quality education in the schools of the state. To be an excellent, effective educator, an individual must receive comprehensive, rigorous, and effective training in the art and science of teaching and in the skills and subjects that the individual will teach.

Local education providers who hire teachers who have not completed an adequate preparation program, including high-quality clinical practice, are likely to experience a high turnover rate because new teachers who are not well trained leave the profession in their first year of teaching at more than twice the rate of those who have had clinical practice and rigorous preparation;

Student achievement is likely to suffer when teachers are not well prepared for the challenges of the classroom and when teachers do not remain on the job for more than one or two years. In addition, schools with high teacher turnover rates struggle to make long-term improvement.

Research suggests that an effective teacher preparation program should include opportunities for teacher candidates to spend time in the classroom beginning in the first year of the program and continuing and increasing throughout the program, culminating in a full year of clinical practice using a classroom residency model in the final year of the program; and

To be effective, clinical practice must be directed and mentored by an experienced, high-quality master teacher who devotes significant time to working with the teacher candidate. These master teachers should receive training for the role of mentor teacher that results in a license endorsement as well as meaningful compensation for the time spent working with a teacher candidate and sufficient time within the daily work schedule to spend with the teacher candidate.

The general assembly finds, therefore, that it is appropriate to direct the department of education and the department of higher education to collaborate with local education providers, approved educator preparation programs, alternative teacher programs, and other interested parties to identify best practices in providing comprehensive, rigorous, and effective teacher preparation and guidelines for implementing these best practices. The general assembly further finds that it is in the best interests of the state to establish a grant program to provide funding for training and reimbursements for mentor teachers who provide guidance and oversight for teacher candidates while they participate in clinical practice.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-190), ch. 153, p. 1806, § 1, effective May 10.

23-78-103. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Alternative teacher program" has the same meaning as provided in section 22-60.5-102.

"Approved educator preparation program" means an educator preparation program for teachers that the commission on higher education has reviewed pursuant to section 23-1-121 and determined meets the performance-based standards established by the commission pursuant to section 23-1-121 and the requirements of section 23-1-108.

"Clinical practice" means practical, field-based experience that a teacher candidate gains through working in a classroom under the direct supervision of a mentor teacher.

"Commission" means the Colorado commission on higher education established in section 23-1-102.

"Educator preparation program" or "program" means an alternative teacher program or an approved educator preparation program.

"Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a public, private, or proprietary postsecondary institution authorized by the commission on higher education to offer educator preparation programs.

"Local education provider" means a school district organized pursuant to article 30 of title 22; a board of cooperative services, created pursuant to article 5 of title 22, that operates a public school; or a charter school that is authorized by a school district pursuant to part 1 of article 30.5 of title 22 or by the state charter school institute pursuant to part 5 of article 30.5 of title 22.

"Master certificate" means the certificate issued by the department of education pursuant to section 22-60.5-202 and the implementing rules of the state board of education, which recognizes professional teacher licensees who are involved in ongoing professional development and training and who have advanced competencies or expertise or who have demonstrated outstanding achievements.

"National-board certified" means that a teacher holds a certification from the national board for professional teaching standards.

"State board" means the state board of education created in section 1 of article IX of the state constitution.

"Teacher candidate" means a person who is enrolled in an educator preparation program for teaching.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-190), ch. 153, p. 1807, § 1, effective May 10.

23-78-104. Educator preparation program - best practices - guidelines - report.

The department of higher education and the department of education, in collaboration with the deans of the schools of education in Colorado institutions of higher education, or their designees, shall review research and practices from other states and other countries to identify best practices in providing educator preparation programs, including effective curricula, teaching teacher candidates the science of teaching reading and strategies to ensure all students learn to read, course scope and sequence, and timing of and effective practices in providing clinical practice. The departments and deans, or their designees, shall work with persons who implement alternative teacher programs, local education providers, teachers, and other interested parties in identifying the best practices. No later than January 1, 2020, the departments shall jointly adopt guidelines to assist educator preparation programs in adopting and implementing the best practices, including best practices to ensure that teacher candidates are well trained to teach students to read.

The department of higher education and the department of education shall jointly prepare a report concerning the identified best practices, the adopted guidelines, and regulatory and legislative recommendations to ensure that the policies and criteria for reviewing and approving educator preparation programs pursuant to sections 22-2-109 (5), 22-60.5-115 (2), 22-60.5-205 (3), and 23-1-121 align with the identified best practices and are designed to determine the degree to which educator preparation programs are implementing the best practices. On or before January 15, 2020, the departments shall submit the report to the commission, the state board, and the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees. To the extent necessary, the commission shall amend its guidelines and the state board shall amend its rules to align with the best practices.

On or before March 1, 2020, each educator preparation program shall submit to the department of higher education and the department of education a plan demonstrating how the educator preparation program expects to phase in implementation of the identified best practices over the following three academic years.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-190), ch. 153, p. 1808, § 1, effective May 10.

23-78-105. Teacher mentor grant program - created - standards - report.

There is created in the department of higher education the teacher mentor grant program to provide money to partnering local education providers and educator preparation programs to provide training and stipends for teachers who serve as mentors for teacher candidates participating in clinical practice. Subject to available appropriations and qualifying applications, the department of higher education shall award grants beginning in the 2019-20 budget year. The department shall establish the duration of each grant as a period of up to three budget years, subject to annual review and renewal.

A partnership consisting of at least one local education provider and at least one educator preparation program may submit an application for a grant to the department of higher education in accordance with guidelines adopted by the department. The department shall establish the application requirements, which must include a plan by which the applicant intends to sustain the teacher mentor program after the grant period ends. In selecting grant recipients, the department shall ensure, to the extent practicable, that the grant recipients include applicants of varying size from rural, urban, and suburban areas across the state. The department may award grants only to those applicants that commit to implementing a teacher mentor program that:

Recruits only teachers who have at least three years of experience teaching and, to the extent practicable:

Are rated effective or higher through a licensed personnel performance evaluation system pursuant to article 9 of title 22; and

Hold a master certificate or are national-board certified;

Provides training in mentoring best practices, as identified pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, for all teachers who are recruited to serve as mentor teachers;

Ensures that the employing local education provider provides time within the mentor teacher's schedule to provide oversight and support for the teacher candidate;

Pays each mentor teacher a stipend of at least two thousand dollars per school year or at least two thousand five hundred dollars per school year if the mentor teacher holds a master certificate or is national-board certified;

In addition to mentoring teacher candidates, provides mentoring for newly employed teachers through an induction program for at least two school years after employment; and

Collects and provides to the department of higher education nonidentifying data concerning teacher effectiveness ratings, retention, and other job-satisfaction and success measures, as described by the department, for teachers who receive mentoring through the teacher mentor program.

The department of higher education and the department of education, in collaboration, shall work with the deans of the schools of education in Colorado institutions of higher education, or their designees, persons who implement alternative teacher programs, local education providers, teachers, and other interested parties to identify best practice standards and guidelines for teacher mentoring. The department of higher education shall adopt the standards and guidelines and make them available to local education providers and educator preparation programs by January 1, 2020, and shall review and update the standards as necessary. A teacher residency program, operating pursuant to article 60.3 of title 22, or a teaching fellowship program, operating pursuant to part 3 of this article 78, that provides mentoring for teacher candidates that meets the standards adopted pursuant to this subsection (3) may apply to receive a grant through the teacher mentor grant program, subject to the requirements specified in this section.

Beginning in the 2020-21 budget year, the department of higher education shall annually prepare a report concerning the implementation of the teacher mentor grant program. The report must include:

The number, amount, and duration of the grants awarded and the names of educator preparation programs and local education providers participating in the grant recipient partnerships;

A summary of the information received from grant recipients pursuant to subsection (2)(f) of this section; and

Any regulatory or legislative recommendations for improving the implementation of teacher mentor programs across the state.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before January 15, 2021, and on or before January 15 each year thereafter, the department of higher education shall submit the report to the commission, the department of education, the state board, and the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate money to the department of higher education to implement the teacher mentor grant program, including an amount to pay the direct administrative costs incurred in implementing the teacher mentor grant program.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-190), ch. 153, p. 1809, § 1, effective May 10.

L. 2020:

(3) amended, (HB 20-1418), ch. 197, p. 944, § 16, effective June 30.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 20-1418, see section 1 of chapter 197, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.